apertium-si-en/apertium-si-en.si.dix
<pardef n="ළම/යා__n">
<e><p><l>යා</l><r>යා<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>යෙක්</l><r>යා<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="subj"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>යෙකු</l><r>යා<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="obj"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ය</l><r>යා<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>යි</l><r>යා<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="subj"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>යින්</l><r>යා<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obj"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>යිනි</l><r>යා<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>

</pardef>

<pardef n="පූ/සා__n">
<e><p><l>සා</l><r>සා<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>සෝ</l><r>සා<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>සා</l><r>සා<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>සෙක්</l><r>සා<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="subj"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>සෙකු</l><r>සා<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="obj"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ස</l><r>සා<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>සෝ</l><r>සා<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="subj"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>සන්</l><r>සා<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obj"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>සනි</l><r>සා<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>

</pardef>


<pardef n="මී/යා__n">
<e><p><l>යා</l><r>යා<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>යෝ</l><r>යා<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>යා</l><r>යා<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>යෙක්</l><r>යා<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="subj"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>යෙකු</l><r>යා<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="obj"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ය</l><r>යා<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>යෝ</l><r>යා<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="subj"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>යන්</l><r>යා<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obj"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>යනි</l><r>යා<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>

</pardef>




    <!-- Verbs -->
	
<!--	
<pardef n="අත්/හල__vblex">
<e><p><l>හරිමින්</l><r>හල<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>හරිමි</l><r>හල<s n="vblex"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>හැරියෙමි</l>හල<r><s n="vblex"/><s n="sg"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>හරිමු</l><r>හල<s n="vblex"/><s n="pl"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>හැරියෙමු</l><r>හල<s n="vblex"/><s n="pl"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>හරියි</l><r>හල<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>හැරියා</l><r>හල<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
-->


<pardef n="හ/රින__vblex">
<e><p><l>රින්න</l><r>රන<s n="vblex"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>රිමින්</l><r>රින<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>රිමි</l><r>රින<s n="vblex"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ැරියෙමි</l><r>රින<s n="vblex"/><s n="sg"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>රිමු</l><r>රින<s n="vblex"/><s n="pl"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ැරියෙමු</l><r>රින<s n="vblex"/><s n="pl"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>රියි</l><r>රින<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ැරියා</l><r>රින<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>	

	
<pardef n="ද/කින__vblex">
<e><p><l>කින්න</l><r>කින<s n="vblex"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>කිමින්</l><r>කින<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>කිමි</l><r>කින<s n="vblex"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ැක්කෙමි</l><r>කින<s n="vblex"/><s n="sg"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>කිමු</l><r>කින<s n="vblex"/><s n="pl"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ැක්කෙමු</l><r>කින<s n="vblex"/><s n="pl"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>කියි</l><r>කින<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ැක්කා</l><r>කින<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ක/රන__vblex">
<e><p><l>රන්න</l><r>රන<s n="vblex"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>රමින්</l><r>රන<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>රමි</l><r>රන<s n="vblex"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>‍ෙරුවෙමි</l><r>රන<s n="vblex"/><s n="sg"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>රමු</l><r>රන<s n="vblex"/><s n="pl"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ෙරුවෙමු</l><r>රන<s n="vblex"/><s n="pl"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>රයි</l><r>රන<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ෙරුවා</l><r>රන<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>	
    


</pardefs>

<e lm="මීයා"><i>මී</i><par n="මී/යා__n"/></e>
<e lm="පිරිමි ළමයා"><i>පිරිමි ළම</i><par n="ළම/යා__n"/></e>
<e lm="ගැහැණු ළමයා"><i>ගැහැණු ළම</i><par n="ළම/යා__n"/></e>
<e lm="වෘකයා"><i>වෘක</i><par n="මී/යා__n"/></e>
<e lm="පූසා"><i>පූ</i><par n="පූ/සා__n"/></e>
<e lm="පාරිභෝගිකයා"><i>පාරිභෝගික</i><par n="මී/යා__n"/></e>
<e lm="අත් හරින"><i>අත් හ</i><par n="හ/රින__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="මග හරින"><i>මග හ</i><par n="හ/රින__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="දිග හරින"><i>දිග හ</i><par n="හ/රින__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="හරින"><i>හ</i><par n="හ/රින__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="දකින"><i>ද</i><par n="ද/කින__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="රකින"><i>ර</i><par n="ද/කින__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ලුහු කරන"><i>ලුහු ක</i><par n="ක/රන__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="එකතු කරන"><i>එකතු ක</i><par n="ක/රන__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="අඩු කරන"><i>අඩු ක</i><par n="ක/රන__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="වැඩි කරන"><i>වැඩි ක</i><par n="ක/රන__vblex"/></e>
